Hawaii, session 2025, SB1527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that marijuana, also known as cannabis, is a plant with psychoactive properties derived primarily from its main psychoactive component tetrahydrocannabinol.  From available data, there is a general agreement that cannabis use is not healthy for young people, and therefore, addressing cannabis use among youth is a major public health concern.  Exposures of cannabis to children and adolescents have increased and so has the significant risk for permanent neuropsychiatric changes with cannabis use in childhood.  Accordingly, physicians, parents, and children alike need to be aware of these risks. The legislature further finds that, except for some refractory epilepsy and seizure disorders, there is no established beneficial use of cannabis in children. There is, however, extensive evidence for serious, permanent harm on developing brains, including cognitive impairment, underdeveloped decision-making capacity, and functional impairment in attention and memory.  The United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention warns that cannabis use impairs youth brain development for decades and that thinking, memory, and learning deficiencies may be permanent and are linked to teen suicide, depression, and social anxiety.  Additionally, studies show that youth using cannabis face a fourfold increase in psychosis diagnoses in adulthood and there is increased risk for the early onset of psychiatric conditions such as schizophrenia.  The long-term effects of cannabis use are greater for teens than adults.  For example, youth with an ongoing cannabis use disorder lost an average of eight intelligence quotient points between ages thirteen and thirty‑eight.  Early youth use of cannabis can also lead to cannabis use disorder, suicidal ideation, poor school performance, increased high school dropout rates, and negative effects on male fertility. The legislature additionally finds that cannabis is addictive, especially for adolescents because their brains are still developing and vulnerable. Adolescents who start using cannabis before the age of fourteen are four times more likely to become addicted by the time they are adults.  Approximately three in ten people who use cannabis have cannabis use disorder.  The risk of developing cannabis use disorder is stronger in people who start using cannabis during youth or adolescence and who use cannabis more frequently. The legislature finds that it is critical that Hawaii reassures the community that there are prevention practices in place to protect youth from the potential harm of cannabis use and community efforts to prevent high-risk behaviors when children and teenagers begin using cannabis.  Youth cannabis use prevention is also important for families due to the increase in youth hospitalizations for hallucinations, nausea, and seizures due to pediatric ingestions of cannabis primarily occurring at home.  Prevention programs are best when combining a community focus on social norms and economic conditions with support from schools, health administrators, health care professionals, child advocacy groups, parent associations, and local officials.  Adolescent substance misuse prevention involves strategies and programs aimed at reducing the risk of young people using or misusing drugs, alcohol, and other substances.  Prevention efforts focus on addressing the factors that increase vulnerability to substance use while promoting protective factors that foster healthy development and resilience. The legislature also finds that there are informational media campaigns and evidence-based prevention strategies already developed that communities could implement to prevent youth cannabis use, such as public education, public policy development, environmental scans, data monitoring, and community collaborations. Gathering data can aid in assessing and developing local strategic planning processes to identify the factors that are contributing to youth cannabis use and related issues. Therefore, Hawaii needs to increase its prevalence of prevention services.  The legislature believes that an informational campaign is needed to inform youth that cannabis use is much more damaging to them than adults. Hawaii should follow other states who have developed short-term media campaigns, increased prevention, and added more resources for youth treatment relating to cannabis use.  Through prevention and education, families and youth can learn positive family factors to build trust for developing a protective role in preventing youth cannabis use. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the alcohol and drug abuse division of the department of health to: (1)  Develop and implement a comprehensive messaging and informational campaign to prevent cannabis use among the State's youth; and (2)  Enter into contracts with community-based organizations to award grants to prevent substance misuse among youth through evidenced-based prevention programs. SECTION 2. (a)  The alcohol and drug abuse division of the department of health shall develop and implement a comprehensive messaging and informational campaign to prevent cannabis use among the State's youth.  The campaign shall include media regarding youth use of cannabis and its impact on public health and safety. (b) The alcohol and drug abuse division of the department of health shall establish and enter into contracts with community-based organizations to award grants to prevent substance misuse among youth through evidenced-based prevention services. (c) The department of health shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. The report shall include: (1)  How funds received pursuant to this Act have been expended; (2)  The specific service providers involved in implementing this Act; (3)  The number of persons who have been engaged by the informational campaign or have received prevention services; (4)  A description of the services provided; (5)  Measurable outcomes; and (6)  Any proposed legislation. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development and implementation of the informational campaign to prevent cannabis use among the State's youth and to enter into contracts to prevent substance misuse among youth. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________